hyph-utf8/source/generic/hyph-utf8/languages/ethiopic/hyph-am.tex
\patterns {
ሀ1
ሁ1
ሂ1
ሃ1
ሄ1
ህ1
ሆ1
ሇ1
ለ1
ሉ1
ሊ1
ላ1
ሌ1
ል1
ሎ1
ሏ1
ሐ1
ሑ1
ሒ1
ሓ1
ሔ1
ሕ1
ሖ1
ሗ1
መ1
ሙ1
ሚ1
ማ1
ሜ1
ም1
ሞ1
ሟ1
ሠ1
ሡ1
ሢ1
ሣ1
ሤ1
ሥ1
ሦ1
ሧ1
ረ1
ሩ1
ሪ1
ራ1
ሬ1
ር1
ሮ1
ሯ1
ሰ1
ሱ1
ሲ1
ሳ1
ሴ1
ስ1
ሶ1
ሷ1
ሸ1
ሹ1
ሺ1
ሻ1
ሼ1
ሽ1
ሾ1
ሿ1
ቀ1
ቁ1
ቂ1
ቃ1
ቄ1
ቅ1
ቆ1
ቇ1
ቈ1
ቊ1
ቋ1
ቌ1
ቍ1
ቐ1
ቑ1
ቒ1
ቓ1
ቔ1
ቕ1
ቖ1
ቘ1
ቚ1
ቛ1
ቜ1
ቝ1
በ1
ቡ1
ቢ1
ባ1
ቤ1
ብ1
ቦ1
ቧ1
ቨ1
ቩ1
ቪ1
ቫ1
ቬ1
ቭ1
ቮ1
ቯ1
ተ1
ቱ1
ቲ1
ታ1
ቴ1
ት1
ቶ1
ቷ1
ቸ1
ቹ1
ቺ1
ቻ1
ቼ1
ች1
ቾ1
ቿ1
ኀ1
ኁ1
ኂ1
ኃ1
ኄ1
ኅ1
ኆ1
ኇ1
ኈ1
ኊ1
ኋ1
ኌ1
ኍ1
ነ1
ኑ1
ኒ1
ና1
ኔ1
ን1
ኖ1
ኗ1
ኘ1
ኙ1
ኚ1
ኛ1
ኜ1
ኝ1
ኞ1
ኟ1
አ1
ኡ1
ኢ1
ኣ1
ኤ1
እ1
ኦ1
ኧ1
ከ1
ኩ1
ኪ1
ካ1
ኬ1
ክ1
ኮ1
ኯ1
ኰ1
ኲ1
ኳ1
ኴ1
ኵ1
ኸ1
ኹ1
ኺ1
ኻ1
ኼ1
ኽ1
ኾ1
ዀ1
ዂ1
ዃ1
ዄ1
ዅ1
ወ1
ዉ1
ዊ1
ዋ1
ዌ1
ው1
ዎ1
ዏ1
ዐ1
ዑ1
ዒ1
ዓ1
ዔ1
ዕ1
ዖ1
ዘ1
ዙ1
ዚ1
ዛ1
ዜ1
ዝ1
ዞ1
ዟ1
ዠ1
ዡ1
ዢ1
ዣ1
ዤ1
ዥ1
ዦ1
ዧ1
የ1
ዩ1
ዪ1
ያ1
ዬ1
ይ1
ዮ1
ዯ1
ደ1
ዱ1
ዲ1
ዳ1
ዴ1
ድ1
ዶ1
ዷ1
ዸ1
ዹ1
ዺ1
ዻ1
ዼ1
ዽ1
ዾ1
ዿ1
ጀ1
ጁ1
ጂ1
ጃ1
ጄ1
ጅ1
ጆ1
ጇ1
ገ1
ጉ1
ጊ1
ጋ1
ጌ1
ግ1
ጎ1
ጏ1
ጐ1
ጒ1
ጓ1
ጔ1
ጕ1
ጘ1
ጙ1
ጚ1
ጛ1
ጜ1
ጝ1
ጞ1
ጟ1
ጠ1
ጡ1
ጢ1
ጣ1
ጤ1
ጥ1
ጦ1
ጧ1
ጨ1
ጩ1
ጪ1
ጫ1
ጬ1
ጭ1
ጮ1
ጯ1
ጰ1
ጱ1
ጲ1
ጳ1
ጴ1
ጵ1
ጶ1
ጷ1
ጸ1
ጹ1
ጺ1
ጻ1
ጼ1
ጽ1
ጾ1
ጿ1
ፀ1
ፁ1
ፂ1
ፃ1
ፄ1
ፅ1
ፆ1
ፇ1
ፈ1
ፉ1
ፊ1
ፋ1
ፌ1
ፍ1
ፎ1
ፏ1
ፐ1
ፑ1
ፒ1
ፓ1
ፔ1
ፕ1
ፖ1
ፗ1
ፘ1
ፙ1
ፚ1
}
